Utah statutes.
51-9-601.   Act of Congress accepted -- Funds to be apportioned.

(1)  The state renews its acceptance of the apportionment of money received from forest reserves made by the Act of May 23, 1908, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 500 et seq., and all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, and renews its acceptance of the act upon the terms and conditions set forth in the act.

(2)  The apportionment money provided by the act shall be used for the benefit of the public schools and public roads of the counties containing the forest reserves.



Amended by Chapter 8, 2009 General Session

